Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 11 Loans to Transportation Commission

§ 24-11-101.
Special obligation loans.

The Wyoming transportation commission, a public instrumentality of the state of Wyoming, may borrow money from the Wyoming community development authority. Borrowing shall be evidenced by a special obligation loan or loans bearing interest at a rate or rates not exceeding ten percent (10%) per annum. Any such special obligation loan shall not constitute a debt nor an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitations. The proceeds of each special obligation loan shall be used for the purpose of constructing or otherwise acquiring highway facilities which become necessary by reason of the location and expansion of mineral extractive industries and other industrial developments in the state.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-125; Laws 1977, ch. 51, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1996, ch. 89, § 1.

Unconstitutional application. —

This chapter is unconstitutionally applied when the loan terms from the Wyoming community development authority require that the debt be paid from future excise taxes to be collected beyond the current year in which the loan is made. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

This chapter is related act to Wyoming Community Development Authority Act

(§§

9-7-101

through

9-7-125

). Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).